District of Columbia statutes.
3-1310

Divisions.

There shall be established within the Board a City Lottery and Numbers Game Division and a Charitable Games Division. Each Division shall have a Division Chief (hereinafter referred to as “Chief ”) who shall administer and coordinate operation of authorized activities in the respective Division. Each Chief shall maintain full and complete records of the operation of the Division which shall include, but not be limited to, a statement of revenues and/or license fees; prize disbursements, where applicable; and administrative expenses of the Division. Such records shall be open and available to the public.

Mar. 10, 1981, D.C. Law 3-172, § 4, 27 DCR 4736
Apr. 11, 1987, D.C. Law 6-220, § 2(b)(2), 34 DCR 900

History

1981 Ed., § 2-2510.

Prior Codifications